Washington statutes.
RCW 15.80.620

Assuming to act as weighmaster or weigher.

It shall be unlawful for any person not licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter to:

(1) Hold himself or herself out, in any manner, as a weighmaster or weigher; or

(2) Issue any ticket as a certified weight ticket.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6111; 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 33.]